District of Columbia statutes.
1-623.05

Total disability.

(a)

If the disability is total, subject to the limitations in § 1-623.06a, the District government shall pay the employee during the disability monthly monetary compensation equal to 66 2/3 percent of his or her monthly pay, which shall be known as his or her basic compensation for total disability.

(b)

The loss of use of both hands, both arms, both feet, or both legs or the loss of sight of both eyes is prima facie permanent total disability.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2305, 25 DCR 5740
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 1062(b)(5), 57 DCR 6242

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-623.04, § 1-623.07, and § 1-623.10.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-624.5.
1973 Ed., § 1-353.5.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-223, in subsec. (a), substituted “, subject to the limitations in § 1-623.06a, the District government” for “the District of Columbia government”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 1062(b)(5) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).